Utah statutes.
53A-25b-201.   Authority of the State Board of Education.
(1)  The State Board of Education is the governing board of the Utah Schools
for the Deaf and the Blind.
(2) (a)  The board shall appoint a superintendent for the Utah Schools for the
Deaf and the Blind.
(b) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b)(ii), the superintendent
shall:
(A)  hold an administrative/supervisory license;
(B)  have demonstrated success in administration of education programs;
(C)  have demonstrated skill in organizational management; and
(D)  have a knowledge of special education practice and law.
(ii)  The board may grant a letter of authorization permitting a person with
outstanding professional qualifications, including management experience and
skills consistent with the mission of the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the
Blind, to be appointed as superintendent.
(c)  The board shall establish the salary for the superintendent.
(3) (a)  The board shall:
(i)  appoint members of the Advisory Council for the Utah Schools for the Deaf
and the Blind; and
(ii)  receive and consider the recommendations and advice of the advisory
council.
(b)  The board is not obligated to follow the recommendations of the advisory
council.
(4)  The board shall approve the annual budget and expenditures of the Utah
Schools for the Deaf and the Blind.
